Hawaii statutes.
§501-8 Registrar may act in any circuit.
The registrar may act in any judicial circuit. After lands have been
registered under this chapter, the registrar may make all memoranda affecting
the title, and enter and issue certificates of title as provided herein. [L
1903, c 56, §9; RL 1925, §3198; RL 1935, §5007; RL 1945, §12607; RL 1955,
§342-8; HRS §501-8; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next